Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.800

Uniform ballot envelope design work group. (Expires January 1, 2027.)

(1) A work group is established to approve a uniform ballot envelope design to be used by all counties in each election beginning with the 2026 primary election.

(2) The work group must be chaired by the secretary of state, or the secretary's designee, and include at a minimum the following members, appointed by the secretary of state:

(a) Two county auditors or their designees, with one auditor residing in western Washington and one auditor residing in eastern Washington;

(b) A representative from the University of Washington Evans school of public policy and governance;

(c) A representative from a nonprofit educational research organization with expertise in designing voting materials; and

(d) Other recognized experts and staff as deemed necessary by the work group's chair.

(3) This section expires January 1, 2027.

[ 2024 c 269 s 12.]